Indiana, session 2026, HB1174.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 12-9-5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.74-2022,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. The division shall administer the following
programs:
(1) Programs established under any of the following statutes:
(A) This article.
(B) IC 12-11.
(C) IC 12-12.
(D) IC 12-12.7.
(2) Programs under the following statutes, to the extent the
division has responsibilities for programs under those statutes:
(A) IC 12-24.
(B) IC 12-26.
(C) IC 12-27.
(D) IC 12-28.
(E) IC 12-29.
(F) IC 36-8-29.
2026 IN 1174—LS 6655/DI 116


(3) Supported employment for a person with developmental
disabilities.
(4) Epilepsy service centers program.
(5) Epilepsy clinic program.
(6) Medicaid waivers for in-home services for treatment of
developmental disabilities.
SECTION 2. IC 36-8-29 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 29. Project Lifesaver Program
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "Project Lifesaver" means the
community based, public safety, nonprofit organization that
provides:
(1) law enforcement agencies;
(2) fire and rescue agencies; and
(3) caregivers;
with a program designed to protect and locate an individual with
a cognitive disorder who is prone to wandering behavior.
Sec. 2. Not later than January 1, 2027, a county shall establish
and maintain its own Project Lifesaver program.
Sec. 3. The county fiscal body of a county shall appropriate and
approve the money necessary for the county to comply with this
chapter.
Sec. 4. (a) The division of disability and rehabilitative services
shall ensure that a county complies with this chapter.
(b) The division of disability and rehabilitative services shall
report, in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6, county compliance
to the general assembly not later than March 1, 2027.
(c) The division of disability and rehabilitative services may
adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to carry out this chapter.
2026 IN 1174—LS 6655/DI 116